New Jersey, session 221, S1844.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any regulation of the Council on Affordable Housing to the contrary, no fair share obligation shall result from and no fees by municipalities shall be permitted to be charged to a developer pursuant to the Fair Housing Act, P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), upon the construction of facilities on land that has been designated as a contaminated site by the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection or that is zoned for industrial use. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.